Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-527
Definitions.

In sections 21-527 to 21-534:

(1) After a merger or after the merger means when a merger under section 21-530 becomes effective and afterwards.

(2) Before a merger or before the merger means before a merger under section 21-530 becomes effective.

(3) Continuing protected series means a protected series of a surviving company which continues in uninterrupted existence after a merger under section 21-530.

(4) Merging company means a limited liability company that is party to a merger under section 21-530.

(5) Nonsurviving company means a merging company that does not continue in existence after a merger under section 21-530.

(6) Relocated protected series means a protected series of a nonsurviving company which, after a merger under section 21-530, continues in uninterrupted existence as a protected series of the surviving company.

(7) Surviving company means a merging company that continues in existence after a merger under section 21-530.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 28.
January 1, 2021